Nevada, session 83, SB246-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. The Charter of the City of Las Vegas, being chapter
517, Statutes of Nevada 1983, at page 1391, is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to be designated as section 3.310,
immediately following section 3.300, to read as follows:
Sec. 3.310 Workforce development.
1. The City Council shall establish a workforce
development program, in coordination with all applicable
agencies which provide workforce development services, to
reduce the rate of unemployment in all areas of the City that
-
*SB246_R3*

– 3 –
have a high rate of poverty. The workforce development
program established pursuant to this section:
(a) Must prioritize outreach and assistance in
neighborhoods that have historically had high rates of
poverty;
(b) Must not prioritize any one minority group over
another; and
(c) Must include, without limitation:
(1) Targets to share work opportunities for all
economic development projects within the boundary of the
City with residents of the City based on the priorities
established pursuant to paragraph (a); and
(2) Engagement and outreach regarding work
opportunities from the beginning of an economic
development project until completion.
2. The City Council shall:
(a) Receive an update on the workforce development
program established pursuant to subsection 1 on a quarterly
basis.
(b) Post information about the workforce development
program established pursuant to subsection 1 in a
conspicuous place on the Internet website of the City.
3. Every public utility which is owned or operated by
the City shall include in each utility bill sent to a customer
clear and conspicuous notification of the Internet address
that sets forth opportunities in workforce development
available to residents of the City.
4. In each building that is owned by the City, there
must be posted in a clear and conspicuous place all job
openings that are available in the building.
5. The City Council shall provide a written report each
year to the Director of the Department of Employment,
Training and Rehabilitation and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to
the Legislature, or if the Legislature is not in session, the
Legislative Commission, describing the efforts made by the
workforce development program established pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 2. Section 3.300 of the Charter of the City of Las Vegas,
being chapter 338, Statutes of Nevada 2007, at page 1532, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 3.300 Programs: Employment and training.
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 and
section 3.310 and in addition to any other powers authorized
by specific statute, the City Council may exercise such
-
*SB246_R3*

– 4 –
powers and enact such ordinances, not in conflict with the
laws of this State, as the City Council determines are
necessary and proper for the development and provision of
programs relating to employment and training.
2. The City Council shall not impose or increase a tax
for the purposes set forth in subsection 1 unless the tax or
increase is otherwise authorized by specific statute.
Sec. 3. The Charter of the City of North Las Vegas, being
chapter 573, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 1210, is hereby
amended by adding thereto a new section to be designated as section
3.110, immediately following section 3.100, to read as follows:
Sec. 3.110 Workforce development.
1. The City Council shall establish a workforce
development program, in coordination with all applicable
agencies which provide workforce development services, to
reduce the rate of unemployment in areas of the City that
have a high rate of poverty. The workforce development
program established pursuant to this section:
(a) Must prioritize outreach and assistance in
neighborhoods that have historically had high rates of
poverty;
(b) Must not prioritize any one minority group over
another; and
(c) Must include, without limitation:
(1) Targets to share work opportunities for all
economic development projects within the boundary of the
City with residents of the City based on the priorities
established pursuant to paragraph (a); and
(2) Engagement and outreach regarding work
opportunities from the beginning of an economic
development project until completion.
2. The City Council shall:
(a) Receive an update on the workforce development
program established pursuant to subsection 1 on a quarterly
basis.
(b) Post information about the workforce development
program established pursuant to subsection 1 in a
conspicuous place on the Internet website of the City.
3. Every public utility which is owned or operated by
the City shall provide quarterly in a utility bill sent to a
customer clear and conspicuous notification of the Internet
address that sets forth opportunities in workforce
development available to residents of the City.
-
*SB246_R3*

– 5 –
4. In each building that is owned by the City, there
must be posted in a clear and conspicuous place all job
openings that are available in the building.
5. The City Council shall provide a written report each
year to the Director of the Department of Employment,
Training and Rehabilitation and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to
the Legislature, or if the Legislature is not in session, the
Legislative Commission, describing the efforts made by the
workforce development program established pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 3.2. Section 1.110 of the Charter of the City of North Las
Vegas, being chapter 254, Statutes of Nevada 2021, at page 1325, is
hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 1.110 Charter Committee: Officers; meetings;
duties.
1. The Charter Committee shall:
[1.] (a) Elect a Chair and Vice Chair from among its
members, who each serve for a term of 2 years;
[2.] (b) Meet at least [once every 2 years before the
beginning of each regular session] four times between
regular sessions of the Legislature and at other times when
requested by the City Council or the Chair of the Committee;
[and
3.] (c) Set the agenda for every meeting of the Charter
Committee. The City Council may request not more than
four items be considered by the Charter Committee at a
meeting of the Charter Committee; and
(d) Appear before the City Council on a date to be set
after the final biennial meeting of the Charter Committee is
conducted pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection [2] 1 and
before the beginning of the next regular session of the
Legislature to advise the City Council with regard to the
recommendations of the Charter Committee concerning
necessary amendments to this Charter.
2. The City Council, officers and employees of the City
shall not interfere with the duties of the Charter Committee
or commit any abuse of power with respect to the Charter
Committee.
3. Each person who is appointed to serve as a member
of the Charter Committee shall complete training which
must include, without limitation, instruction relating to:
(a) The Code of Ethical Standards set forth in chapter
281A of NRS, including, without limitation, how to file a
-
*SB246_R3*

– 6 –
complaint with the Commission on Ethics created pursuant
to NRS 281A.200;
(b) The provisions of chapter 241 of NRS; and
(c) Responsibilities of the Charter Committee.
Sec. 3.4. Section 3.040 of the Charter of the City of North Las
Vegas, being chapter 573, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended
by chapter 254, Statutes of Nevada 2021, at page 1331, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 3.040 City Clerk: Office; duties.
1. The City Clerk shall:
(a) Before entering upon the duties of office, take and
subscribe the constitutional oath of office.
(b) Keep his or her office at the place of meeting of the
City Council or some other place convenient thereto, as the
City Council may direct.
[(b)] (c) Keep the corporate seal and be the custodian of
all official papers and records of the City, including, without
limitation, contracts, agreements, documents, resolutions,
ordinances, minutes and official city election records.
[(c)] (d) Keep a record of the proceedings of, and be the
Clerk of the City Council, whose meetings it shall be his or
her duty to attend.
[(d)] (e) Record votes of members of the City Council.
[(e)] (f) Direct the transcription and keeping of minutes
and official records and the making and keeping of audio
recordings or transcripts of all City Council meetings.
[(f)] (g) Countersign official contracts, bonds and other
official City documents.
[(g)] (h) Make arrangements for regular, special or
emergency meetings of the City Council.
[(h)] (i) Supervise the operation and maintenance of the
records management system of the City.
[(i)] (j) Supervise the printing of all ballots for city
elections.
[(j)] (k) Certify the election returns.
[(k)] (l) Administer official oaths for the City.
2. Copies of all papers filed in the office of the City
Clerk and transcripts from all records of the City Council
certified by him or her, under the corporate seal, shall be
evidence in all courts to the same effect as if the original were
produced.
-
*SB246_R3*

– 7 –
Sec. 3.6. Section 3.020 of the Charter of the City of North Las
Vegas, being chapter 573, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended
by chapter 254, Statutes of Nevada 2021, at page 1330, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 3.020 City Manager: Power and duties.
1. The City Manager is the Chief Administrative Officer
of the City. He or she is responsible to the City Council for
the efficient and proper administration of all City affairs
placed in his or her charge by or under this Charter.
2. The City Manager shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, this Charter, or
personnel rules adopted pursuant to this Charter, appoint, and
when he or she deems it necessary for the good of the service,
discharge or suspend all City employees and appointed
administrative officers provided for by this Charter. He or she
may authorize any administrative officer who is subject to his
or her direction and supervision to exercise the powers
enumerated in this paragraph with respect to subordinates in
that officer’s department, office or agency.
(b) Direct and supervise the administration of all
departments, offices and agencies of the City, except:
(1) As otherwise provided by law; and
(2) For any department, office or agency whose head
is not appointed by the City Manager.
(c) Attend all City Council meetings and have the right to
take part in all discussions. The City Manager may not vote.
(d) Be responsible for the enforcement of all laws,
provisions of this Charter and acts of the City Council subject
to enforcement by the City Manager or by his or her officers
subject to his or her direction and supervision.
(e) Prepare and submit the annual budget and capital
program to the City Council.
(f) Submit to the City Council and make available to the
public a complete report on the finances and administrative
activities of the City as of the end of each fiscal year.
(g) Make such other reports as the City Council may
require concerning the operations of City departments, offices
and agencies subject to his or her direction and supervision.
(h) Keep the City Council fully advised as to the financial
condition and future needs of the City and make such
recommendations to the City Council concerning the affairs
as he or she deems desirable.
(i) Perform such other duties as are specified in this
Charter or which may be required by the City Council.
-
*SB246_R3*

– 8 –
3. In addition to the duties set forth in subsection 2, on
or before January 1 of each year, the City Manager shall
submit to the Committee on Local Government Finance
created by NRS 354.105 a report that compares the
projected and actual budgets of each special revenue fund
maintained by the City for the immediately preceding fiscal
year. Such report must:
(a) Identify each special revenue fund;
(b) Indicate in detail all revenue received in the special
revenue fund for the immediately preceding fiscal year; and
(c) Indicate in detail all expenses for the immediately
preceding fiscal year which were paid with money from the
special revenue fund.
4. The report submitted pursuant to this section to the
Committee on Local Government Finance is a public
record.
Sec. 3.8. 1. On or before January 1, 2024, the City Manager
of the City of the North Las Vegas shall submit to the Committee on
Local Government Finance created by NRS 354.105 a report that
compares the projected and actual budgets of each special revenue
fund maintained by the City for each fiscal year of the period
beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2023. Such report
must:
(a) Identify each special revenue fund;
(b) Indicate in detail all revenue received in the special revenue
fund for each fiscal year in the reporting period; and
(c) Indicate in detail all expenses for the fiscal year which were
paid with money from the special revenue fund.
2. The report submitted pursuant to this section to the
Committee on Local Government Finance is a public record.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB246_R3*